Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,090,191 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Mortuary
and Cemetery Board.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,134,344 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $727,306
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,569,834 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Board of Medical
Imaging.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,255,280 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the State Board of
Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,617,303 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon State
Veterinary Medical Examining Board.
Enrolled House Bill 5023 (HB 5023-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House April 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 26, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5023 (HB 5023-A) Page 2